Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 1. Districts.

Collateral references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools, §§ 15 — 58.

78 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, §§ 14-73.

Propriety, under First Amendment, of school board’s censorship of public school libraries or course books. 64 ALR Fed. 771.

Sec. 14.12.010.
Districts of state public school system.

The districts of the state public school system are as follows:

each home rule and first class city in the unorganized borough is a city school district;

each organized borough is a borough school district;

the area outside organized boroughs and outside home rule and first class cities is divided into regional educational attendance areas.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 3 ch 124 SLA 1975; am § 7 ch 208 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 1994)

Sec. 14.12.020.
Support, management, and control in general; military reservation schools.

Each regional educational attendance area shall be operated on an areawide basis under the management and control of a regional school board. The regional school board manages and controls schools on military reservations within its regional educational attendance area until the military mission is terminated or so long as management and control by the regional educational attendance area is approved by the department. However, operation of the military reservation schools by a city or borough school district may be required by the department under AS

14.14.110

. If the military mission of a military reservation terminates or continued management and control by the regional educational attendance area is disapproved by the department, operation, management, and control of schools on the military reservation transfers to the city or borough school district in which the military reservation is located.

Each borough or city school district shall be operated on a district-wide basis under the management and control of a school board.

The legislature shall provide the state money necessary to maintain and operate the regional educational attendance areas. The borough assembly for a borough school district, and the city council for a city school district, shall provide the money that must be raised from local sources to maintain and operate the district.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966; am §§ 8, 9 ch 46 SLA 1970; am § 5 ch 32 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 1975; am §§ 4, 5 ch 124 SLA 1975)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 7, ch. 32, SLA 1973, provides: “Notwithstanding provisions of this Act, all agreements between organized boroughs and the Department of Education for the operation of schools on military reservations that were made before April 3, 1973 remain in force.”

Sec. 14.12.025.
New school districts.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a new school district may not be formed if the total number of pupils for the proposed school district is less than 250 unless the commissioner of education and early development determines that formation of a new school district with less than 250 pupils would be in the best interest of the state and the proposed school district.

History.

(§ 10 ch 75 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.17.139

. Renumbered in 1992.

In 1999, “commissioner of education” was changed to “commissioner of education and early development” in this section in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.